Mississippi, session 2026, SB2499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-23-65, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-23-65.  The State Department of Education is authorized and directed to promulgate rules and regulations for the payment of such financial assistance and the administration of Sections 37-23-61 through 37-23-75 generally. The State Department of Education shall have the authority to promulgate and enforce reasonable rules and regulations establishing standards for administration of the program contemplated by Sections 37-23-61 through 37-23-75, consistent with the maintenance of high quality programs for the benefit of the exceptional children served. The State Department of Education shall require that the programs for which children are eligible for financial assistance under Sections 37-23-61 through 37-23-75 be designed to provide individualized appropriate special education and related services that enable a child to reach his or her appropriate and uniquely designed goals for success. The State Department of Education, subject to specific appropriation by the Legislature, shall have the authority to promulgate and enforce reasonable rules and regulations to establish a grant program to assist public school districts in funding autism specialists, evidence-based professional development for educators of exceptional children and sensory and instructional supports for exceptional children and to prioritize such grants to school districts serving high numbers of underserved students.  The department is authorized to require public school districts to provide accommodations, including sensory supports, rooms or equipment, for students whose individualized Education Program (IEP) or 504 Plan identifies a need in or to ensure access to education, using best practices to guide the design, supervision and evaluation of these spaces to meet individual student needs.  The department shall develop a budget for the funding of such autism specialists, evidence-based educator training and sensory and instructional supports and submit a budget request to the Legislature on an annual basis. There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Exceptional Children Grant Program Fund to be comprised of funds appropriated by the Legislature to provide for making grants to school districts under this paragraph.  The appropriation to the Exceptional Children Grant Program Fund shall not exceed Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) in any fiscal year. SECTION 2.  Section 37-23-69, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-23-69.  The State Department of Education may determine and pay the amount of the financial assistance to be made available to each applicant, and see that all applicants and the programs for them meet the requirements of the program for exceptional children.  No financial assistance shall exceed the obligation actually incurred by the applicant for educational costs, which shall include special education and related services as defined by the Mississippi Department of Education Policies and Procedures Regarding Children with Disabilities under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA).  Within the amount of available state funds for that purpose, each such applicant may receive assistance according to the following allowances: (a)  If the applicant chooses to attend a private school, a parochial school or a speech, hearing and/or language clinic having an appropriate program for the applicant, and if the school or clinic meets federal and state regulations, then the educational costs reimbursement will be one hundred percent (100%) of the first Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) in educational costs charged by the school or clinic; or, if the applicant is under six (6) years of age, and no program appropriate for the child exists in the public schools of his domicile, then the reimbursement shall be one hundred percent (100%) of the first Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) in educational costs charged by the school or clinic, and fifty percent (50%) of the next Eight Hundred Dollars ($800.00) in educational costs charged by the school or clinic; (b)  A public school district shall be reimbursed for the educational costs of an applicant up to an annual maximum based on a cost factor determined by the State Board of Education if the following conditions are met:  (i) an applicant in the age range six (6) through twenty (20) requests the public school district where he resides to provide an education for him and the nature of the applicant's educational problem is such that, according to best educational practices, it cannot be met in the public school district where the child resides; (ii) the public school district decides to provide the applicant a free appropriate education by placing him in a private school, a parochial school or a speech, hearing and/or language clinic having an appropriate program for the applicant; (iii) the program meets federal and state regulations; and (iv) the applicant is approved for financial assistance by a State Level Review Board established by the State Board of Education.  The Review Board will act on financial assistance requests within five (5) working days of receipt.  Nothing in this paragraph shall prevent two (2) or more public school districts from forming a cooperative to meet the needs of low incidence exceptional children, nor shall the public school be relieved of its responsibility to provide an education for all children.  If state monies are not sufficient to fund all applicants, there will be a ratable reduction for all recipients receiving state funds under this section.  School districts may pay additional educational costs from available federal, state and local funds. If an exceptional child, as defined in Section 37-23-3, is placed in a therapeutic or other group home licensed or approved by the state that has no educational program associated with it, the local school district in which the home is located shall offer an appropriate educational program to that child. At any time that the Individualized Education Program (IEP) Committee in the district where the home is located determines that an exceptional child, as defined in Section 37-23-3, residing in that home can no longer be provided a free appropriate public education in that school district, and the State Department of Education agrees with that decision, then the State Department of Education shall recommend to the Department of Human Services placement of the child by the Department of Human Services, which shall take appropriate action.  The placement of the exceptional child in the facility shall be at no cost to the local school district.  Funds available under Sections 37-23-61 through 37-23-77, as well as any available federal funds, may be used to provide the educational costs of the placement.  If the exceptional child is under the guardianship of the Department of Human Services or another state agency, the State Department of Education shall pay only for the educational costs of that placement, and the other agency shall be responsible for the room, board and any other costs.  The special education and related services provided to the child shall be in compliance with State Department of Education and any related federal regulations. The State Board of Education may promulgate regulations that are necessary to implement this section; and (c)  If an appropriate local or regional system of care, including a free appropriate public education, is available for exceptional children who are currently being served in out-of-district or Department of Human Services placements under paragraph (b) of this section or Section 37-23-77, then the state funds from the State Department of Education that would have been used for those placements may be paid into a pool of funds with funds from other state agencies to be used for the implementation of the individualized plans of care for those children.  If there are sufficient funds to serve additional exceptional children because of cost savings as a result of serving these students at home and/or matching the pooled funds with federal dollars, the funds may be used to implement individualized plans of care for those additional exceptional children.  Each local or regional provider of services included in the individualized plans of care shall comply with all appropriate state and federal regulations.  The State Board of Education may promulgate regulations that are necessary to implement this section. The State Department of Education may also provide for the payment of that financial assistance in installments and for proration of that financial assistance in the case of children attending a school or clinic for less than a full school session and, if available funds are insufficient, may allocate the available funds among the qualified applicants and local school districts by reducing the maximum assistance provided for in this section. Any monies provided an applicant under Sections 37-23-61 through 37-23-75 shall be applied by the receiving educational institution as a reduction in the amount of the educational costs paid by the applicant, and the total educational costs paid by the applicant shall not exceed the total educational costs paid by any other child in similar circumstances enrolled in the same program in that institution.  However, this limitation shall not prohibit the waiving of all or part of the educational costs for a limited number of children based upon demonstrated financial need, and the State Department of Education may adopt and enforce reasonable rules and regulations to carry out the intent of these provisions. The State Department of Education, subject to specific appropriation by the Legislature, shall have the authority to promulgate and enforce reasonable rules and regulation to establish a grant program to assist public school districts in funding autism specialists, evidence-based professional development for educators of exceptional children and sensory and instructional supports for exceptional children and to prioritize such grants to school districts serving high numbers of underserved students.  The department is authorized to require public school districts to provide accommodations, including sensory supports, rooms or equipment, for students whose individualized Education Program (IEP) or 504 Plan identifies a need in or to ensure access to education, using best practices to guide the design, supervision and evaluation of these spaces to meet individual student needs.  The department shall develop a budget for the funding of such autism specialists, evidence-based educator training and sensory and instructional supports and submit a budget request to the Legislature on an annual basis. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.